Washington statutes.
RCW 36.88.040

Formation of district—By resolution of intention—Election—Rules.

The election provided herein for cases where the improvement is initiated by resolution shall be governed by the following rules: (1) All ballots must be signed by the owner or reputed owner of property within the proposed district according to the records of the county auditor; (2) each ballot must be returned to the clerk of the board not later than one week after the public hearing; (3) each property owner shall have one vote for each full dollar of estimated assessment against his or her property as determined by the preliminary estimates and assessment roll; (4) the valid ballots shall be tabulated and a majority of the votes cast shall determine whether the formation of the district shall be approved or rejected.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4140; 1963 c 4 s 36.88.040. Prior: 1951 c 192 s 4.]